Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.271

Mortgage loan originators—System information may be challenged.

The director shall establish a process whereby mortgage loan originators may challenge information entered into the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry by the director.

[ 2009 c 120 s 25.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "and registry" was removed by 2013 c 29 s 1.

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.